Utah statutes.
41-1a-1204.   Automobile driver education fee -- Amount -- When paid -- Exception.

(1)  Each year there is levied and shall be paid to the commission the automobile driver education fee.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the fee is $2.50 upon each motor vehicle to be registered.

(b)  The following registrations are exempt from the fee in Subsection (2)(a):

(i)  a motorcycle registration; and

(ii)  a registration of a vehicle with a Purple Heart special group license plate issued in accordance with Section 41-1a-421.

